Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2424
Informal appointment unavailable in certain cases.

If an application for informal appointment indicates the existence of a possible unrevoked testamentary instrument which may relate to property subject to the laws of this state, and which is not filed for probate in this court, the registrar shall decline the application.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 102, UPC § 3-311.